Utah statutes.
78B-3-415.   Actions under Utah Governmental Immunity Act.

The provisions of this part shall apply to malpractice actions against health care providers which are brought under the Utah Governmental Immunity Act if applicable.  This part may not affect the requirements for filing notices of claims, times for commencing actions and limitations on amounts recoverable under the Utah Governmental Immunity Act.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

